Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-1418
Program or capital construction project; state funds; restrictions on use; district court of Lancaster County; jurisdiction; appeals; procedure.

(1) No state warrant shall be issued by the Department of Administrative Services or used by any public institution for the purpose of funding any program or capital construction project which has not been approved or which has been disapproved by the commission pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act. If state funding for any such program or project cannot be or is not divided into warrants separate from other programs or projects, the department shall reduce a warrant to the public institution which includes funding for the program or project by the amount of tax funds designated by the Legislature which are budgeted in that fiscal year by the public institution for use for the program or project.

(2) The district court of Lancaster County shall have jurisdiction to enforce an order or decision of the commission entered pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act and to enforce this section.

(3) Any person or public institution aggrieved by a final order of the commission entered pursuant to section 85-1413, 85-1414, or 85-1416 shall be entitled to judicial review of the order. Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition in the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after public notice of the final decision by the commission is given. The filing of the petition or the service of summons upon the commission shall not stay enforcement of such order. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury on the record of the commission. The court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin enforcement of any order of the commission which is (a) in violation of constitutional provisions, (b) in excess of the constitutional or statutory authority of the commission, (c) made upon unlawful procedure, or (d) affected by other error of law.

(4) A party may secure a review of any final judgment of the district court by appeal to the Court of Appeals. Such appeal shall be taken in the manner provided by law for appeals in civil cases and shall be heard de novo on the record.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 21;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 40;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 39;

Laws 2010, LB1072, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB59, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB946, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB211, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB546, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB3, § 2.